Utah statutes.
41-6a-528.   Reckless driving -- Penalty.
(1)  A person is guilty of reckless driving who operates a vehicle:
(a)  in willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property; or
(b)  while committing three or more moving traffic violations under Title 41,
Chapter 6a, Traffic Code, in a series of acts occurring within a single
continuous period of driving covering three miles or less in total distance.
(2)  A person who violates Subsection (1) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
